Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-397
Refund or credit; salvage branded
certificate of title.

If a motor vehicle or trailer has a
salvage branded certificate of title issued as a result of an insurance company
acquiring the motor vehicle or trailer through a total loss settlement, the
prior owner of the motor vehicle or trailer who is a party to the settlement
may receive a refund or credit of unused fees and taxes by (1) filing an application
with the county treasurer within sixty days after the date of
the settlement stating that title to the motor vehicle or trailer was transferred
as a result of the settlement and (2) returning the registration certificate,
the license plates, and, when appropriate, the validation decals or, in the
case of the unavailability of the registration certificate, license plates,
or validation decals, filing an affidavit with the county treasurer regarding
the transfer of title due to the settlement and the unavailability of the
certificate, license plates, or validation decals. The owner may receive a
refund or credit of the registration fees and motor vehicle taxes and fees
for the unexpired months remaining in the registration year determined based
on the date when the motor vehicle or trailer was damaged and became unavailable
for service. When the owner registers a replacement motor vehicle or trailer
at the time of filing such affidavit, the credit may be immediately applied
against the registration fee and the motor vehicle tax and fee for the replacement
motor vehicle or trailer. When no such replacement motor vehicle or trailer
is so registered, the county treasurer shall refund the unused registration
fees. If the motor vehicle or trailer was damaged and became unavailable for
service during the same month in which it was registered, no refund or credit
shall be allowed for such month. When any such motor vehicle or trailer is
reregistered within the same registration year in which its registration has
been canceled, the taxes and fees shall be that portion of the registration
fee and the motor vehicle tax and fee for the remainder of the registration
year.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 97;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 36;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 63.